Hawaii statutes.
[§431:30-115] Product filing and approval.
(a) Insurers and third-party filers seeking to have a product approved by the
commission shall file such product with, and pay applicable filing fees to, the
commission. Nothing in this article shall be construed to restrict or
otherwise prevent an insurer from filing its product in any state wherein such
insurer is licensed to conduct the business of insurance, and such filing shall
be subject to the laws of the state where filed.

(b) The commission shall establish appropriate
filing and review processes and procedures pursuant to commission rules and
operating procedures. Notwithstanding any provision herein to the contrary,
the commission shall adopt rules to establish conditions and procedures under
which the commission will provide public access to product filing information.
In establishing such rules, the commission shall consider the interests of the
public in having access to such information, as well as protection of personal
medical and financial information and trade secrets that may be contained in a
product filing or supporting information.

(c) Any product approved by the commission may
be sold or otherwise issued in compacting states for which the insurer is
legally authorized to do business. [L 2004, c 104, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next